fr: viande de porc traitée en salaison et précuite
ca: porc curat i precuit
es: cerdo curado y precocido

en: chipolata slim sausage
fr: chipolatas
hr: chipolata tanka kobasica
it: salsiccia Chipolata sottile

en: pork skin
bg: свинска кожа, свински кожички
de: Schweinehaut
fr: Peau de porc
hr: svinjska koža
it: pelle di maiale

en: stewed pork
bg: задушено свинско месо
ca: estofat de porc
de: geschmortes Schweinefleisch
es: estofado de cerdo
fi: haudutettu sianliha
fr: viandes de porc à l'étouffée
hr: pirjana svinjetina
it: maiale in umido

en: ham, pork ham
bg: шунка, свинска шунка
ca: pernil, pernil de porc
da: skinke
de: Schinken
es: jamón, jamón de cerdo
fi: kinkku, kinkkua, siankinkku, porsaankinkku
fr: jambon, jambon de porc
hr: šunka
hu: sonka
it: prosciutto
ja: ハム
lv: šķiņķis
nb: skinke
nl: ham
pl: szynka, szynka wieprzowa, szynki, szynki wieprzowej, mięso z szynki wieprzowej, mięso wieprzowe z szynki
pt: presunto
ru: Ветчина
sv: skinka, skinka av gris, svinskinka
zh: 火腿

en: Coppa
fr: Coppa
hr: coppa
it: coppa

en: Ham in cube
fr: Dés de jambon
hr: šunka u kockama
it: prosciutto a cubetti

en: dry-cured ham
fr: jambon sec
hr: pršut

en: dry-cured Parma ham
fr: jambon sec de Parme
hr: sušena parma šunka

en: dry-cured Serrano ham
fr: jambon sec Serrano
hr: sušena serrano šunka

en: british ham
de: britischer Schinken
hr: britanska šunka
it: prosciutto britannico

en: raw ham
ca: pernil cru
de: Rohschinken
es: jamón crudo
fi: raakakinkku
fr: jambon cru
hr: sirova šunka
it: prosciutto crudo
nl: rauwe ham

en: Serrano raw ham
ca: pernil serrà
de: Serrano Rohschinken
es: jamón serrano
fr: jambon cru de Serrano
hr: serrano sirova šunka
it: prosciutto crudo serrano

en: Italian raw ham
de: Italiänischer Rohschinken
fr: jambon cru italien
hr: talijanska sirova šunka
it: prosciutto crudo italiano
nl: Italiaanse rauwe ham

en: smoked cured ham
fr: jambon cru fumé
hr: dimljena pršuta
it: prosciutto crudo affumicato

en: Bayonne ham
fr: Jambon de Bayonne
hr: bajon šunka
it: prosciutto di Bayonne

en: cooked ham
ca: pernil cuit
da: kogt skinke
de: gekochter Schinken
es: jamón cocido
fi: keittokinkku, kypsennetty kinkku
fr: jambon cuit
hr: kuhana šunka
hu: főtt sonka
it: prosciutto cotto
nl: gekookte ham
pt: fiambre cozinhado
sv: kokt skinka

en: superior cooked ham
ca: pernil cuit de qualitat superior
de: Delikatess Kochschinken
es: jamón cocido de calidad superior
fi: Superior keittokinkku
fr: jambon cuit supérieur
hr: vrhunska kuhana šunka
it: prosciutto cotto Superiore

en: smoked ham with natural juices
de: geräucherter Schinken mit natürlichen Säften
hr: pršuta s prirodnim sokovima
it: prosciutto affumicato con succhi naturali

en: pork by-product
de: Nebenprodukt aus Schweinefleisch
es: Subproducto de cerdo
fi: sianlihan sivutuote, sianlihasta saatava sivutuote
fr: sous-produit du porc
hr: svinjski nusproizvod
it: Prodotto con maiale
nl: Varkensvleesbijproduct